dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.aff
SFX q Y 27
SFX q   e           a          ie is:genitive is:plural is:neuter
SFX q   e           u          ie is:dative is:plural is:neuter
SFX q   e           í          ie is:locative is:plural is:neuter
SFX q   e           čím        ie is:instrumental is:plural is:neuter
SFX q   i           ov         i is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   i           om         i is:dative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   i           och        i is:locative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   i           ami        i is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           ov         [^i]e is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           om         [^i]e is:dative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           och        [^i]e is:locative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           ami        [^á]če is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           mi         áče is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   e           mi         íže is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           ov         [^eoa][prst]y is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           ov         [^r]dy is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           ov         [bglsv]y is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   aty         át         aty is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           ier        ery is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           0          ory is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           0          rdy is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           0          ágy is:genitive is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           om         [bdglprstv]y is:dative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           och        [bdglprstv]y is:locative is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           mi         [^n][bdlprstv]y is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           mi         ngy is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
SFX q   y           ami        n[gs]y is:instrumental is:plural is:masculine
