dictionaries/sk_SK/src/Slovak.dic
alimenty/q po:noun is:masculine
anály/q po:noun is:masculine
boby/q po:noun is:masculine
droby/q po:noun is:masculine
džínsy/q po:noun is:masculine
Falklandy/q po:noun is:masculine
fašiangy/q po:noun is:masculine
Galapágy/q po:noun is:masculine
háby/q po:noun is:masculine
hody/q po:noun is:masculine
ihličie/q po:noun is:neuter
Karpaty/q po:noun is:masculine
kmotrovci/q po:noun is:masculine
Komory/q po:noun is:masculine
legínsy/q po:noun is:masculine
lopúšie/q po:noun is:neuter
mangrovy/q po:noun is:masculine
maskáče/q po:noun is:masculine
Nedožery/q po:noun is:masculine
nešpory/q po:noun is:masculine
pačesy/q po:noun is:masculine
pančucháče/q po:noun is:masculine
priezvedy/q po:noun is:neuter
roráty/q po:noun is:masculine
slipy/q po:noun is:masculine
subtrópy/q po:noun is:masculine
Tlmače/q po:noun is:masculine
Vary/q po:noun is:masculine
vohľady/q po:noun is:masculine
výzvedy/q po:noun is:masculine
zálety/q po:noun is:masculine
zvedy/q po:noun is:masculine
